Utah statutes.
58-60-407.   Scope of practice -- Limitations.
(1)  A licensed professional counselor may engage in all acts and practices
defined as the practice of professional counseling without supervision, in
private and independent practice, or as an employee of another person, limited
only by the licensee's education, training, and competence.
(2) (a)  To the extent an individual has completed the educational
requirements of Subsection 58-60-305(1)(d), a certified professional
counseling intern may engage in all acts and practices defined as the practice
of professional counseling if the practice is:
(i)  within the scope of employment as a certified professional counselor with
a public agency or private clinic as defined by division rule; and
(ii)  under supervision of a qualified licensed mental health therapist as
defined in Subsection 58-60-102(5).
(b)  A certified professional counselor intern may not engage in the
independent practice of professional counseling.
